District of Columbia statutes.
29-705.07

Right to distribution.

If a partner or transferee becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the partner or transferee has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited partnership with respect to the distribution. However, the limited partnership’s obligation to make a distribution shall be subject to offset for any amount owed to the limited partnership by the partner or dissociated partner on whose account the distribution is made.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(6)(D), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “If” for “When.”

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 507 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.